District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.29

Bus right-of-way at intersections.

(a)

A motor vehicle driver shall be prohibited from passing to the left and pulling in front of a bus to make a right turn when the bus is at a bus stop at an intersection to receive or discharge passengers; the vehicle shall stay or merge behind the bus to effect its turn.

(b)

A person violating subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to a fine of $100.00 or twice the fine prescribed for illegal turns, whichever is greater.

(c)

Within 60 days of September 29, 2006, the Mayor shall ensure that affixed on the rear of each bus operating in the District of Columbia is a sticker or decal advising drivers of the prohibition described in subsection (a) of this section.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall relieve the operator of a bus from complying with all applicable traffic regulations or from otherwise exercising due caution in the operation of a bus.

(e)

For the purposes of this section, “Bus” means public transit such as Metrobuses, the Downtown Circulator, the Georgetown Blue Buses, Maryland and Virginia State commuter charters, and Tourmobile vehicles.

History

Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-34, § 2a
as added Sept. 29, 2006, D.C. Law 16-165, § 2, 53 DCR 6190